Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.140

Warning statement—Further requirements.

The word "warning" and the following warning statement regarding signing petitions must appear on petitions as prescribed by this title and must be printed on each petition sheet such that they occupy not less than four square inches of the front of the petition sheet.

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or both.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1815; 1993 c 256 s 5. Formerly RCW 29.79.115.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 256: See notes following RCW 29A.84.280.